Illinois, session 104th, SB3200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pesticide Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 and by adding Section 13.6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 60/4)  (from Ch. 5, par. 804)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    1. "Director" means Director of the Illinois Department of 9Agriculture or his authorized representative.10    2. "Active Ingredient" means any ingredient which will 11prevent, destroy, repel, control or mitigate a pest or which 12will act as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.13    3. "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if the 14strength or purity is not within the standard of quality 15expressed on the labeling under which it is sold, distributed 16or used, including any substance which has been substituted 17wholly or in part for the pesticide as specified on the 18labeling under which it is sold, distributed or used, or if any 19valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in 20part abstracted.21    4. "Agricultural Commodity" means produce of the land, 22including, but not limited to, plants and plant parts, 23livestock and poultry and livestock or poultry products,   SB3200- 2 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1seeds, sod, shrubs and other products of agricultural origin 2including the premises necessary to and used directly in 3agricultural production. Agricultural commodity also includes 4aquatic products, including any aquatic plants and animals or 5their by-products that are produced, grown, managed, harvested 6and marketed on an annual, semi-annual, biennial or short-term 7basis, in permitted aquaculture facilities.8    5. "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species 9including, but not limited to, man and other mammals, birds, 10fish, and shellfish.11    5.5. "Barrier mosquitocide" means a pesticide that is 12formulated to kill adult mosquitoes and that is applied so as 13to leave a residual mosquitocidal coating on natural or 14manmade surfaces. "Barrier mosquitocide" does not include a 15product that is exempt from registration under the Federal 16Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, or rules adopted 17pursuant to that Act.18    5.6. "Barrier mosquitocide treatment" means application of 19a barrier mosquitocide to a natural or manmade surface. 20    6. "Beneficial Insects" means those insects which during 21their life cycle are effective pollinators of plants, 22predators of pests or are otherwise beneficial.23    7. "Certified applicator".24        A. "Certified applicator" means any individual who is 25    certified under this Act to purchase, use, or supervise 26    the use of pesticides which are classified for restricted   SB3200- 3 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1    use.2        B. "Private applicator" means a certified applicator 3    who purchases, uses, or supervises the use of any 4    pesticide classified for restricted use, for the purpose 5    of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned, 6    rented, or otherwise controlled by him or his employer, or 7    applied to other property if done without compensation 8    other than trading of personal services between no more 9    than 2 producers of agricultural commodities.10        C. "Licensed Commercial Applicator" means a certified 11    applicator, whether or not he is a private applicator with 12    respect to some uses, who owns or manages a business that 13    is engaged in applying pesticides, whether classified for 14    general or restricted use, for hire. The term also applies 15    to a certified applicator who uses or supervises the use 16    of pesticides, whether classified for general or 17    restricted use, for any purpose or on property of others 18    excluding those specified by subparagraphs 7 (B), (D), (E) 19    of Section 4 of this Act.20        D. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" means a 21    certified applicator who uses or supervises the use of 22    pesticides classified for general or restricted use for 23    any purpose on property of an employer when such activity 24    is a requirement of the terms of employment and such 25    application of pesticides under this certification is 26    limited to property under the control of the employer only   SB3200- 4 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1    and includes, but is not limited to, the use or 2    supervision of the use of pesticides in a greenhouse 3    setting. "Commercial Not For Hire Applicator" also 4    includes a certified applicator who uses or supervises the 5    use of pesticides classified for general or restricted use 6    as an employee of a state agency, municipality, or other 7    duly constituted governmental agency or unit.8    8. "Defoliant" means any substance or combination of 9substances which cause leaves or foliage to drop from a plant 10with or without causing abscission.11    9. "Desiccant" means any substance or combination of 12substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying 13of plant tissue.14    10. "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other 15than a firearm or equipment for application of pesticides when 16sold separately from pesticides, which is intended for 17trapping, repelling, destroying, or mitigating any pest, other 18than bacteria, virus, or other microorganisms on or living in 19man or other living animals.20    11. "Distribute" means offer or hold for sale, sell, 21barter, ship, deliver for shipment, receive and then deliver, 22or offer to deliver pesticides, within the State.23    12. "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all 24plants and animals including man, living therein and the 25interrelationships which exist among these.26    13. "Equipment" means any type of instruments and   SB3200- 5 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1contrivances using motorized, mechanical or pressure power 2which is used to apply any pesticide, excluding pressurized 3hand-size household apparatus containing dilute ready to apply 4pesticide or used to apply household pesticides.5    14. "FIFRA" means the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and 6Rodenticide Act, as amended.7    15. "Fungi" means any non-chlorophyll bearing 8thallophytes, any non-chlorophyll bearing plant of a lower 9order than mosses or liverworts, as for example rust, smut, 10mildew, mold, yeast and bacteria, except those on or in living 11animals including man and those on or in processed foods, 12beverages or pharmaceuticals.13    16. "Household Substance" means any pesticide customarily 14produced and distributed for use by individuals in or about 15the household.16    17. "Imminent Hazard" means a situation which exists when 17continued use of a pesticide would likely result in 18unreasonable adverse effects on the environment or will 19involve unreasonable hazard to the survival of a species 20declared endangered by the U.S. Secretary of the Interior or 21to species declared to be protected by the Illinois Department 22of Natural Resources.23    18. "Inert Ingredient" means an ingredient which is not an 24active ingredient.25    19. "Ingredient Statement" means a statement of the name 26and percentage of each active ingredient together with the   SB3200- 6 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1total percentage of inert ingredients in a pesticide and for 2pesticides containing arsenic in any form, the ingredient 3statement shall include percentage of total and water soluble 4arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. In the case of 5spray adjuvants the ingredient statement need contain only the 6names of the functioning agents and the total percent of those 7constituents ineffective as spray adjuvants.8    20. "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate 9animals generally having the body more or less obviously 10segmented for the most part belonging to the class Insects, 11comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as for example 12beetles, caterpillars, and flies. This definition encompasses 13other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless 14and usually have more than 6 legs as for example spiders, 15mites, ticks, centipedes, and millipedes.16    21. "Label" means the written, printed or graphic matter 17on or attached to the pesticide or device or any of its 18containers or wrappings.19    22. "Labeling" means the label and all other written, 20printed or graphic matter: (a) on the pesticide or device or 21any of its containers or wrappings, (b) accompanying the 22pesticide or device or referring to it in any other media used 23to disseminate information to the public, (c) to which 24reference is made to the pesticide or device except when 25references are made to current official publications of the U. 26S. Environmental Protection Agency, Departments of   SB3200- 7 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1Agriculture, Health, Education and Welfare or other Federal 2Government institutions, the state experiment station or 3colleges of agriculture or other similar state institution 4authorized to conduct research in the field of pesticides.5    23. "Land" means all land and water area including 6airspace, and all plants, animals, structures, buildings, 7contrivances, and machinery appurtenant thereto or situated 8thereon, fixed or mobile, including any used for 9transportation.10    24. "Licensed Operator" means a person employed to apply 11pesticides to the lands of others under the direction of a 12"licensed commercial applicator" or a "licensed commercial 13not-for-hire applicator".14    25. "Nematode" means invertebrate animals of the phylum 15nemathelminthes and class nematoda, also referred to as nemas 16or eelworms, which are unsegmented roundworms with elongated 17fusiform or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle and 18inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts.19    26. "Permit" means a written statement issued by the 20Director or his authorized agent, authorizing certain acts of 21pesticide purchase or of pesticide use or application on an 22interim basis prior to normal certification, registration, or 23licensing.24    27. "Person" means any individual, partnership, 25association, fiduciary, corporation, or any organized group of 26persons whether incorporated or not.  SB3200- 8 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1    28. "Pest" means (a) any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, 2weed, or (b) any other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or 3animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism, 4excluding virus, bacteria, or other microorganism on or in 5living animals including man, which the Director declares to 6be a pest.7    29. "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of 8substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or 9mitigating any pest or any substance or mixture of substances 10intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.11    30. "Pesticide Dealer" means any person who distributes 12registered pesticides to the user.13    31. "Plant Regulator" means any substance or mixture of 14substances intended through physiological action to affect the 15rate of growth or maturation or otherwise alter the behavior 16of ornamental or crop plants or the produce thereof. This does 17not include substances which are not intended as plant 18nutrient trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant or seed 19inoculants or soil conditioners or amendments.20    32. "Protect Health and Environment" means to guard 21against any unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.22    33. "Registrant" means a person who has registered any 23pesticide pursuant to the provision of FIFRA and this Act.24    34. "Restricted Use Pesticide" means (i) any pesticide 25with one or more of its uses classified as restricted by order 26of the Administrator of USEPA or the Director or (ii) any   SB3200- 9 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1pesticide that contains a neonicotinoid. "Restricted Use 2Pesticide" does not include a pesticide containing a 3neonicotinoid that is applied by a licensed applicator or 4certified technician working in structural pest control.5    35. "SLN Registration" means registration of a pesticide 6for use under conditions of special local need as defined by 7FIFRA.8    36. "State Restricted Pesticide Use" means any pesticide 9use which the Director determines, subsequent to public 10hearing, that an additional restriction for that use is needed 11to prevent unreasonable adverse effects.12    37. "Structural Pest" means any pests which attack and 13destroy buildings and other structures or which attack 14clothing, stored food, commodities stored at food 15manufacturing and processing facilities or manufactured and 16processed goods.17    38. "Unreasonable Adverse Effects on the Environment" 18means the unreasonable risk to the environment, including man, 19from the use of any pesticide, when taking into account 20accrued benefits of as well as the economic, social, and 21environmental costs of its use.22    39. "USEPA" means United States Environmental Protection 23Agency.24    40. "Use inconsistent with the label" means to use a 25pesticide in a manner not consistent with the label 26instruction, the definition adopted in FIFRA as interpreted by   SB3200- 10 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1USEPA shall apply in Illinois.2    41. "Weed" means any plant growing in a place where it is 3not wanted.4    42. "Wildlife" means all living things, not human, 5domestic, or pests.6    43. "Bulk pesticide" means any registered pesticide which 7is transported or held in an individual container in undivided 8quantities of greater than 55 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 9100 pounds net dry weight.10    44. "Bulk repackaging" means the transfer of a registered 11pesticide from one bulk container (containing undivided 12quantities of greater than 100 U.S. gallons liquid measure or 13100 pounds net dry weight) to another bulk container 14(containing undivided quantities of greater than 100 U.S. 15gallons liquid measure or 100 pounds net dry weight) in an 16unaltered state in preparation for sale or distribution to 17another person.18    45. "Business" means any individual, partnership, 19corporation or association engaged in a business operation for 20the purpose of selling or distributing pesticides or providing 21the service of application of pesticides in this State.22    46. "Facility" means any building or structure and all 23real property contiguous thereto, including all equipment 24fixed thereon used for the operation of the business.25    47. "Chemigation" means the application of a pesticide 26through the systems or equipment employed for the primary   SB3200- 11 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1purpose of irrigation of land and crops.2    48. "Use" means any activity covered by the pesticide 3label, including, but not limited to, application of 4pesticide, mixing and loading, storage of pesticides or 5pesticide containers, disposal of pesticides and pesticide 6containers and reentry into treated sites or areas.7    49. "Education course" means a course approved by the 8Department of Agriculture that may be used by a certified 9applicator, licensed operator, or registered pesticide dealer 10to meet renewal requirements under the Act.11    50. "License transfer" means the transfer of an existing 12license or certification by the Department from one certified 13applicator or operator to another certified applicator or 14operator for the period of time remaining on the license 15before renewal. 16    51. "Neonicotinoid" means any pesticide, excluding any 17wood preservative pesticide, that contains clothianidin, 18imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, dinotefuran, acetamiprid, 19thiacloprid, nithiazine, nitenpyram, or any other 20neonicotinoid that may be identified by rule adopted by the 21Department of Agriculture.22    52. "Ornamental plant" means a plant that is perennial, 23annual, grass, or ground cover and that is purposefully 24planted for aesthetic reasons. 25(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 104-363, eff. 1-1-26.)   SB3200- 12 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1    (415 ILCS 60/13.6 new)2    Sec. 13.6. Neonicotinoids.3    (a) In this Section, "zoophilous species" means any 4species of plants pollinated by insects, birds, or bats. 5    (b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a pesticide containing a 6neonicotinoid may not be used on an ornamental plant unless:7        (1) the pesticide is used outdoors for:8            (A) structural pest control; or9            (B) abatement of nonnative insect borers, such as 10        Agrilus planipennis or related or similar insect 11        pests;12        (2) the abatement application of the pesticide is 13    restricted to:14            (A) basal bark spray;15            (B) basal drench solely at the base of a tree;16            (C) soil injection solely at the base of a tree; or17            (D) systemic root flare or trunk injection;18        (3) no broadcast soil treatment of the pesticide, 19    foliar spraying of the pesticide, or dusting of the 20    pesticide is used; and21        (4) the abatement application of the pesticide to a 22    zoophilous species occurs after the blooming period has 23    passed and early enough to ensure that chemical 24    decomposition occurs before the following bloom season.25    (c) The Department of Agriculture, the Department of 26Public Health, the Environmental Protection Agency, or any   SB3200- 13 -LRB104 18429 TRT 31871 b1combination of those agencies under the authorities vested in 2those agencies under Section 3 of this Act may adopt rules 3conforming with this Section and with the changes made by this 4amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 5    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 6changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 7that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 8represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 9not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 10made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 11Public Act. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.